test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-5-itîw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - itîw :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitititin # I say thus to you, I say thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nititâw # I say thus to him/her, I say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitisin # you say thus to me, you say thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kititâw # you say thus to him/her, you say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: itîw # he/she says thus to another/others, he/she says thus about another/others
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [itikow, itik] # another/others say thus to him/her, another/others say thus about him/her

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-ititân # as I say thus to you, as I say thus about you
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-itak # as I say thus to him/her, as I say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-isiyan # as you say thus to me, as you say thus about me
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-itat # as you say thus to him/her, as you say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-itât # as he/she says thus to another/others, as he/she says thus about another/others
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-itikot # as another/others say thus to him/her, as another/others say thus about him/her

      # Imp
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: isin # (you) say thus to me now, (you) say thus about me now
      itîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: isi # (you) say thus to him/her now, (you) say thus about him/her now
      

      # Prs # Ind

      # 1Sg
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitititin # I say thus to you, I say thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nititâw # I say thus to him/her, I say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kitititinâwâw # I say thus to you all, I say thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nititâwak # I say thus to them, I say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nititimâwa # I say thus to another/others, I say thus about another/others

      # 2Sg
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitisin # you say thus to me, you say thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kititâw # you say thus to him/her, you say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kitisinân # you say thus to us, you say thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kititâwak # you say thus to them, you say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kititimâwa # you say thus to another/others, you say thus about another/others

      # 3Sg
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitisin # you say thus to me, you say thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kititik # he/she says thus to you, he/she says thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kitisinân # you say thus to us, you say thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kititikonaw # he/she says thus to you and us, he/she says thus about you and us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kititikowâw # he/she says thus to you all, he/she says thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kititâwak # you say thus to them, you say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kititimâwa # you say thus to another/others, you say thus about another/others
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: itimîw # he/she says thus to yet another/others, he/she says thus about yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kitititinân # we say thus to you, we say thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nititânân # we say thus to him/her, we say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitititinân # we say thus to you all, we say thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nititânânak # we say thus to them, we say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nititimânâna # we say thus to another/others, we say thus about another/others

      # 12Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kititânaw # we and you say thus to him/her, we and you say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kititânawak # we and you say thus to them, we and you say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kititimânawa # we and you say thus to another/others, we and you say thus about another/others

      # 2Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kitisinâwâw # you all say thus to me, you all say thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kititâwâw # you all say thus to him/her, you all say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitisinân # you all say thus to us, you all say thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kititâwâwak # you all say thus to them, you all say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kititimâwâwa # you all say thus to another/others, you all say thus about another/others

      # 3Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: nititikwak # they say thus to me, they say thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kititikwak # they say thus to you, they say thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nititikonânak # they say thus to us, they say thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kititikonawak # they say thus to you and us, they say thus about you and us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kititikowâwak # they say thus to you all, they say thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: itîwak # they say thus to another/others, they say thus about another/others
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: itimîwak # they say thus to yet another/others, they say thus about yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nititikothiwa # another/others say thus to me, another/others say thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kititikothiwa # another/others say thus to you, another/others say thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [itikow, itik] # another/others say thus to him/her, another/others say thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nititikonâna # another/others say thus to us, another/others say thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kititikonawa # another/others say thus to you and us, another/others say thus about you and us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kititikowâwa # another/others say thus to you all, another/others say thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [itikowak, itikwak] # another/others say thus to them, another/others say thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: itîthiwa # another/others say thus to yet another/others, another/others say thus about yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: itikothiwa # yet another/others say thus to another/others, yet another/others say thus about another/others

      # X
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nititikawin # someone says thus to me, someone says thus about me
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kititikawin # someone says thus to you, someone says thus about you
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: itâw # someone says thus to him/her, someone says thus about him/her
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nititikawinân # someone says thus to us, someone says thus about us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kititikawinaw, kititikawinânaw] # someone says thus to you and us, someone says thus about you and us
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kititikawinâwâw # someone says thus to you all, someone says thus about you all
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: itâwak # someone says thus to them, someone says thus about them
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: itâthiwa # someone says thus to another/others, someone says thus about another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: nititikon
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kititikon
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: itikow
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: nititikonân
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kititikonaw
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kititikowâw
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: itikowak
      itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: itikothiwa
      

      # Prs # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-ititân # as I say thus to you, as I say thus about you
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-itak # as I say thus to him/her, as I say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-ititakwâw # as I say thus to you all, as I say thus about you all
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-itakwâw # as I say thus to them, as I say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-itaki # as I say thus to them, as I say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-itimak # as I say thus to another/others, as I say thus about another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-isiyan # as you say thus to me, as you say thus about me
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-itat # as you say thus to him/her, as you say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-isiyâhk # as you say thus to us, as you say thus about us
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-itacik # as you say thus to them, as you say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-itimat # as you say thus to another/others, as you say thus about another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-isiyan # as you say thus to me, as you say thus about me
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-itisk # as he/she says thus to you, as he/she says thus about you
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-isiyâhk # as you say thus to us, as you say thus about us
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-itikoyâhk # as you say thus to us, as you say thus about us
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-isiyamiht # as you say thus to us, as you say thus about us
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-itikoyahk # as he/she says thus to you and us, as he/she says thus about you and us
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-ititahk # as he/she says thus to you and us, as he/she says thus about you and us
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-itikoyîk # as he/she says thus to you all, as he/she says thus about you all
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-ititîk # as he/she says thus to you all, as he/she says thus about you all
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-itacik # as you say thus to them, as you say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-itimat # as you say thus to another/others, as you say thus about another/others
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-itimât # as he/she says thus to yet another/others, as he/she says thus about yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-ititâhk # as we say thus to you, as we say thus about you
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-itâyâhk # as we say thus to him/her, as we say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-itakiht # as we say thus to him/her, as we say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-ititâhk # as we say thus to you all, as we say thus about you all
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-itâyâhkwâw # as we say thus to them, as we say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-itakihcik # as we say thus to them, as we say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-itimâyâhk # as we say thus to another/others, as we say thus about another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-itâyahk # as we and you say thus to him/her, as we and you say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-itahk # as we and you say thus to him/her, as we and you say thus about him/her
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-itâyahkwâw # as we and you say thus to them, as we and you say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-itahkwâw # as we and you say thus to them, as we and you say thus about them
      PV/î+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-itimâyahk # as we and you say thus to another/others, as we and you say thus about another/others
